Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 13A Administrative Regulations
13A.280.
Statement of consideration — Amendment — Format — Information required — Publication.

Following the last day of the comment period, the administrative body shall give consideration to all comments received at the public hearing and all written comments received during the comment period, including:

Any report filed by the Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy in accordance with KRS 11.202(1)(e) and 13A.270(4), or by a local government in accordance with KRS 11.202(1)(e) and 13A.270(5); and

Any comments regarding the administrative regulation’s major economic impact, as defined in KRS

13A.010

, as submitted by agencies, local governments, or regulated entities.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the administrative body shall file with the commission on or before 12 noon, eastern time, on the fifteenth day of the calendar month following the end of the public comment period the statement of consideration relating to the administrative regulation and, if applicable, the amended after comments version.

If the administrative body has received a significant number of public comments:

It may extend the time for filing the statement of consideration for an ordinary administrative regulation and, if applicable, the amended after comments version by notifying the regulations compiler in writing on or before 12 noon, eastern time, on the fifteenth day of the calendar month following the end of the public comment period; and

The administrative body shall file the statement of consideration for an ordinary administrative regulation and, if applicable, the amended after comments version, with the Commission on or before 12 noon, eastern time, no later than the fifteenth day of the second calendar month following the end of the public comment period.

If the administrative regulation is amended as a result of the hearing or written comments received, the administrative body shall forward the items specified in this paragraph to the regulations compiler by 12 noon, eastern time, on the applicable deadline specified in subsection (2) of this section:

The original and five (5) copies of the administrative regulation indicating any amendments resulting from comments received at the public hearing and during the comment period. The amendments shall be indicated in:

The original wording for an ordinary administrative regulation; or

The wording of an emergency administrative regulation as amended, for an emergency administrative regulation that was amended at a legislative committee meeting pursuant to KRS 13A.190(3);

The original and five (5) copies of the statement of consideration as required by subsection (2) of this section, attached to the back of the original and each copy of the administrative regulation; and

The regulatory impact analysis, tiering statement, federal mandate comparison, or fiscal note on local government. These documents shall reflect changes resulting from amendments made after the public hearing.

The original and four (4) copies of the amended after comments version, the statement of consideration, and the attachments required by paragraph (a)3. of this subsection shall be stapled in the top left corner. The fifth copy shall not be stapled.

At the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper version, the administrative body shall file an electronic version of the amended after comments version, the statement of consideration, and the required attachments saved as a single document for each amended after comments administrative regulation in an electronic format approved by the regulations compiler.

If the administrative regulation is not amended as a result of the public hearing, or written comments received, the administrative body shall file the original and five (5) copies of the statement of consideration with the regulations compiler by 12 noon, eastern time, on the deadline established in subsection (2) of this section. The original and four (4) copies of the statement of consideration shall be stapled in the top left corner. The fifth copy of each statement of consideration shall not be stapled.

If the statement of consideration covers multiple administrative regulations, as authorized by subsection (6)(g)1. of this section, the administrative body shall file with the regulations compiler:

The original and five (5) copies of the statement of consideration as required by paragraph (a) of this subsection; and

Two (2) additional unstapled copies of the statement of consideration for each additional administrative regulation included in the group of administrative regulations.

At the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper version, the administrative body shall file an electronic version of the statement of consideration saved as a single document for each statement of consideration in an electronic format approved by the regulations compiler.

If comments are received either at the public hearing or during the public comment period, the administrative regulation shall be deferred to the next regularly scheduled meeting of the subcommittee following the month in which the statement of consideration is due.

The format for the statement of consideration shall be as follows:

The statement shall be typewritten on white paper, size eight and one-half (8-1/2) by eleven (11) inches. Copies of the statement may be mechanically reproduced;

The first page of the statement of consideration shall have a two (2) inch top margin;

The heading of the statement shall consist of the words “STATEMENT OF CONSIDERATION RELATING TO” followed by the number of the administrative regulation that was the subject of the public hearing and comment period and the name of the promulgating administrative body. The heading shall be centered. This shall be followed by the words “Not Amended After Comments,” “Emergency Not Amended After Comments,” “Amended After Comments,” or “Emergency Amended After Comments,” whichever is applicable;

If a hearing has been held or written comments received, the heading is to be followed by:

A statement setting out the date, time and place of the hearing, if the hearing was held;

A list of those persons who attended the hearing or who submitted comments and the organization, agency, or other entity represented, if applicable; and

The name and title of the representative of the promulgating administrative body;

Following the general information, the promulgating administrative body shall summarize the comments received at the public hearing and during the comment period and the response of the promulgating administrative body. Each subject commented upon shall be summarized in a separate numbered paragraph. Each numbered paragraph shall contain two (2) subsections:

Subsection (a) shall be labeled “Comment,” shall identify the name of the person, and the organization represented if applicable, who made the comment, and shall contain a summary of the comment; and

Subsection (b) shall be labeled “Response” and shall contain the response to the comment by the promulgating administrative body;

Following the summary and comments, the promulgating administrative body shall:

Summarize the statement and the action taken by the administrative body as a result of comments received at the public hearing and during the comment period; and

If amended after the comment period, list the changes made to the administrative regulation in the format prescribed by KRS 13A.320(2)(c) and (d); and

If administrative regulations were considered as a group at a public hearing, one (1) statement of consideration may include the group of administrative regulations. If a comment relates to one (1) or more of the administrative regulations in the group, the summary of the comment and response shall specify each administrative regulation to which it applies.

Emergency administrative regulations shall be in a separate statement of consideration from ordinary administrative regulations.

If the administrative regulation is amended pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the full text of the administrative regulation shall be published in the Administrative Register. The changes made to the administrative regulation shall be typed in bold and made in the format prescribed by KRS 13A.222(2). The administrative regulation shall be reviewed by the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee after such publication.

If requested, copies of the statement of consideration and, if applicable, the amended after comments version of the administrative regulation shall be made available by the promulgating administrative body to persons attending the hearing or submitting comments or who specifically request a copy from the administrative body.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 28, effective April 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 425, § 10, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 516, § 26, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 410, § 20, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 180, § 12, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 38, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 406, § 15, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 89, § 14, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 165, § 6, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 100, § 16, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 138, § 12, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 82, § 25, effective July 15, 2016; 2019 ch. 192, § 6, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 7, § 10, effective February 2, 2021; 2021 ch. 185, § 99, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 207, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/14/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 207, sec. 3. Under Section 5 of that Act, the Act shall be known and may be cited as the Kentucky REINS Act, or the Kentucky Regulations from the Executive in Need of Scrutiny Act.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Environmental Quality Commission could amend a regulation at an Administrative Review Subcommittee meeting without filing a revised statement of consideration and publishing such changes pursuant to this section where the amendments were subsequently published in the administrative register; the changes in the regulation complied with KRS

13A.320

and were properly amended.

OAG 87-6

.

13A.290.
Review by Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee — Review by legislative committee.

Except as provided by KRS

158.6471

and

158.6472

, the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee shall meet monthly to review administrative regulations prior to close of business on the fifteenth day of the calendar month.

The agenda shall:

Include each administrative regulation that completed the public comment process;

Include each administrative regulation for which a statement of consideration was received on or before 12 noon, eastern time, on the fifteenth day of the prior calendar month;

Include each effective administrative regulation that the subcommittee has decided to review;

Include each administrative regulation that was deferred from the prior month’s meeting of the subcommittee; and

Not include an administrative regulation that is deferred, withdrawn, expired, or automatically taken off the agenda under the provisions of this chapter.

Review of an administrative regulation shall include the entire administrative regulation and all attachments filed with the administrative regulation. The review of amendments to existing administrative regulations shall not be limited to only the changes proposed by the promulgating administrative body.

The meetings shall be open to the public.

Public notice of the time, date, and place of the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee meeting shall be given in the Administrative Register.

A representative of the administrative body for an administrative regulation under consideration shall be present to explain the administrative regulation and to answer questions thereon.

If a representative of the administrative body with authority to amend a filed administrative regulation is not present at the subcommittee meeting, the administrative regulation shall be deferred to the next regularly scheduled meeting of the subcommittee.

If a representative of an administrative body for an effective administrative regulation fails to appear before the subcommittee, the subcommittee may:

Defer the administrative regulation to the next regularly scheduled meeting of the subcommittee; or

Make a determination pursuant to KRS 13A.030(2), (3), and (4) or 13A.190(3).

Following the meeting and before the next regularly scheduled meeting of the Commission, the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee shall forward to the Commission its findings, recommendations, or other comments it deems appropriate in writing. The Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee shall also forward to the Commission its findings, recommendations, or other comments it deems appropriate on an effective administrative regulation it has reviewed. The Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee’s findings shall be published in the Administrative Register.

After review by the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee, the Commission shall, on the first Wednesday of the following month, or if the first Wednesday is a legal holiday, the next workday of the month, assign a filed administrative regulation to a legislative committee with subject matter jurisdiction.

Upon notification of the assignment by the Commission, the legislative committee to which the administrative regulation is assigned shall notify the regulations compiler:

Of the date, time, and place of the meeting at which it will consider the administrative regulation; or

That it will not meet to consider the administrative regulation.

Within ninety (90) days of the assignment, the legislative committee may hold a public meeting during which the administrative regulation shall be reviewed.

If the ninetieth day of the assignment falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, the deadline for review shall be the workday following the Saturday, Sunday, or holiday.

If the administrative regulation is assigned to an interim joint committee and a session of the General Assembly begins during the review period, the assignment shall transfer to the Senate and House standing committees with subject matter jurisdiction.

If the administrative regulation is assigned to Senate and House standing committees and a session of the General Assembly adjourns sine die during the review period, the assignment shall transfer to the interim joint committee with subject matter jurisdiction.

An administrative regulation may be transferred more than one (1) time under this paragraph. A transfer shall not extend the review period established by this subsection.

Notice of the time, date, and place of the meeting shall be placed in the legislative calendar.

Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, a legislative committee shall be empowered to make the same determinations and to exercise the same authority as the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee.

This subsection shall apply to administrative regulations filed with the Commission.

A majority of the entire membership of the legislative committee shall constitute a quorum for purposes of reviewing administrative regulations.

In order to amend an administrative regulation pursuant to KRS

13A.320

, defer an administrative regulation pursuant to KRS

13A.300

, or find an administrative regulation deficient pursuant to KRS 13A.030(2), (3), or (4), or 13A.190(3), the motion to amend, defer, or find deficient shall be approved by a majority of the entire membership of the legislative committee. Additionally, during a session of the General Assembly, standing committees of the Senate and House of Representatives shall agree in order to amend an administrative regulation, defer an administrative regulation, or find an administrative regulation deficient by:

Meeting separately; or

Meeting jointly. If the standing committees meet jointly, it shall require a majority vote of Senate members voting and a majority of House members voting, as well as the majority vote of the entire membership of the standing committees meeting jointly, in order to take action on the administrative regulation.

The quorum requirements of subsection (9)(b) of this section shall apply to an effective administrative regulation under review by a legislative committee.

A motion to find an effective administrative regulation deficient shall be approved by:

A majority of the entire membership of the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee; or

A legislative committee in accordance with subsection (9)(c) of this section.

Upon adjournment of the meeting at which a legislative committee has considered an administrative regulation pursuant to subsection (7) or (10) of this section, the legislative committee shall inform the regulations compiler of its findings, recommendations, or other action taken on the administrative regulation.

Following the meeting and before the next regularly scheduled meeting of the Commission, the legislative committee shall forward to the Commission its findings, recommendations, or other comments it deems appropriate in writing. The legislative committee’s findings shall be published in the Administrative Register.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 29, effective April 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 71, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 425, § 11, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 516, § 27, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 410, § 21, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 180, § 13, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 598, § 8, effective April 14, 1998; 2000, ch. 406, § 16, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 89, § 15, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 100, § 17, effective June 20, 2005; 2016 ch. 82, § 26, effective July 15, 2016; 2019 ch. 192, § 7, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 7, § 11, effective February 2, 2021.

13A.300.
Request by promulgating administrative body to defer consideration of administrative regulation — Consideration of deferred administrative regulation — Limitation on number of deferrals — Failure of representative of administrative body to appear before legislative committee.

The administrative body that promulgated an administrative regulation may request that consideration of the administrative regulation be deferred by a legislative committee.

The deferral of an administrative regulation scheduled for review by the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee shall be governed by KRS 13A.020(4) and the following:

A request for deferral of an ordinary administrative regulation filed with the Commission shall be automatically granted if:

The administrative body submits a written letter to the regulations compiler; and

The letter is received prior to the subcommittee meeting;

A request for deferral of an effective administrative regulation or an emergency administrative regulation may be granted if:

The administrative body submits a written letter to the regulations compiler;

The letter is received prior to the subcommittee meeting; and

Approved by the co-chairs of the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee;

A request for deferral may be granted at the discretion of the subcommittee if the request is made by the administrative body orally at a meeting of the subcommittee;

The subcommittee may request that consideration of an administrative regulation be deferred by the promulgating administrative body. Upon receipt of the request, the promulgating administrative body may agree to defer consideration of the administrative regulation;

Except as provided in paragraph (f) of this subsection, an administrative regulation that has been deferred shall be placed on the agenda of the next scheduled meeting of the subcommittee. If it is an administrative regulation filed with the Commission, the subcommittee shall consider the administrative regulation as if it had met all other requirements of filing. Repromulgation shall not be required in those cases; and

An administrative regulation shall not be deferred under this subsection more than twelve (12) times.

The deferral of a filed ordinary administrative regulation referred to a second legislative committee or committees pursuant to KRS 13A.290(6) and (7) shall be governed by this subsection and the voting requirements of KRS 13A.290(9).

A request for deferral shall be automatically granted if:

The administrative body submits a written letter to the regulations compiler; and

The letter is received prior to the legislative committee meeting;

A request for deferral may be granted at the discretion of the second legislative committee if the request is made by the administrative body orally at a meeting of the legislative committee; and

The legislative committee may request that consideration of an administrative regulation be deferred by the promulgating administrative body. Upon receipt of the request, the promulgating administrative body may agree to defer consideration of the administrative regulation.

An administrative regulation that is deferred may be placed on a subsequent agenda of the legislative committee or committees within the review period.

If a filed ordinary administrative regulation that has been deferred is not placed on a subsequent agenda within the review period, the administrative regulation shall take effect at the expiration of the review period.

The deferral of an effective administrative regulation or an emergency administrative regulation under review by a legislative committee shall be governed by this subsection and the voting requirements of KRS 13A.290(9).

A request for deferral may be granted if:

The administrative body submits a written letter to the regulations compiler;

The letter is received prior to the legislative committee meeting; and

Approved by the presiding chair or chairs.

A request for deferral may be granted at the discretion of the legislative committee if the request is made by the administrative body orally at a meeting of the legislative committee.

The legislative committee may request that consideration of an administrative regulation be deferred by the administrative body. Upon receipt of the request, the administrative body may agree to defer consideration of the administrative regulation.

An administrative regulation that is deferred may be placed on a subsequent agenda of the legislative committee.

Except as provided by KRS 13A.290(4), if a representative of an administrative body whose administrative regulation is scheduled for review fails to appear before a legislative committee, the legislative committee in conformance with KRS 13A.290(9) may:

Defer the administrative regulation to the next regularly scheduled meeting of the legislative committee; or

Make a determination pursuant to KRS 13A.030(2) or 13A.190(3).

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 30, effective April 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 71, § 3, effective March 16, 1988; 1988, ch. 425, § 13, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 516, § 28, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 410, § 22, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 180, § 14, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 406, § 17, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 89, § 16, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 100, § 18, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 138, § 13, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 82, § 27, effective July 15, 2016; 2019 ch. 192, § 8, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 7, § 12, effective February 2, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(2/2/2021). In codification, a correction has been made to subsection (5)(b) of this statute. 2021 Senate Bill 2, Section 12, which amended this statute, contained a reference in subsection (5)(b) to “Section 4(2) of this Act,” which would have been codified as “KRS 13A.190(2).” However, it is clear from the context and from consultation with the drafter that the reference was intended to read “Section 4(3) of this Act,” which would be codified as “KRS 13A.190(3).” Under the authority of KRS

7.136

, the Reviser of Statutes has corrected this reference.

(6/27/2019). Under the authority of
KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has modified the internal numbering of this statute from the way it appeared in
2019 Ky. Acts ch. 192, sec. 8.

(7/15/2016). During codification of 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 82, sec. 27, the Reviser of Statutes corrected a manifest clerical or typographical error in references in subsection (3)(c) and (d) of this statute to “subsection (6)(b)1.” and “subsection (6)(b)2.”, respectively, of Section 26 of that Act, which was KRS

13A.290

. The correct references should have been to “subsection (6)(a)1.” and “subsection (6)(a)2.”, respectively, of KRS

13A.290

and are reflected that way in this statute.

13A.310.
Repeal or permissive withdrawal of administrative regulation.

Except as provided in KRS

13A.3102

and

13A.3104

, an ordinary administrative regulation, once adopted, cannot be withdrawn but shall be repealed if it is desired that it no longer be effective.

Except as provided in KRS

13A.3102

and

13A.3104

, an ordinary administrative regulation, once adopted, cannot be suspended but shall be repealed if it is desired to suspend its effect.

An ordinary administrative regulation shall be repealed only by the promulgation of an administrative regulation that:

Is titled “Repeal of (state number of administrative regulation to be repealed)”;

Contains the reasons for repeal in the “NECESSITY, FUNCTION, AND CONFORMITY” paragraph;

Includes in the body of the administrative regulation, a citation to the number and title of the administrative regulation or regulations being repealed; and

Meets the filing and formatting requirements of KRS

13A.220

.

Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, on the effective date of an administrative regulation that repeals an administrative regulation, determined in accordance with KRS

13A.330

or

13A.331

, the regulations compiler shall delete the repealed administrative regulation and the repealing administrative regulation from the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service.

If the repealing administrative regulation specifies an effective date that is after the administrative regulation would become effective pursuant to KRS

13A.330

or

13A.331

, the specified effective date shall be considered the effective date of the repealing administrative regulation. On the specified effective date, the regulations compiler shall delete the repealed administrative regulation and the repealing administrative regulation from the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service.

An administrative body may repeal more than one (1) administrative regulation in an administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection if the administrative regulations being repealed are contained in the same chapter of the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service.

An ordinary administrative regulation may be withdrawn by the promulgating administrative body at any time prior to its adoption.

An ordinary administrative regulation that has been found deficient may be withdrawn by the promulgating administrative body or by the Governor at any time prior to its adoption.

Once an ordinary administrative regulation is withdrawn, it shall not be reinstated, except by repromulgation as a totally new matter.

An emergency administrative regulation may be withdrawn by the promulgating administrative body at any time prior to its expiration.

An emergency administrative regulation that has been found deficient may be withdrawn by the promulgating administrative body or by the Governor at any time prior to its expiration.

If an administrative regulation is withdrawn, the administrative body or the Governor shall inform the regulations compiler of the reasons for withdrawal in writing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 417, § 31, effective April 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 71, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 516, § 29, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 410, § 23, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 180, § 15, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 38, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 406, § 18, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 100, § 19, effective June 20, 2005; 2016 ch. 82, § 28, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 77, § 3, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 192, § 9, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 7, § 13, effective February 2, 2021.

13A.3102.
Expiration of administrative regulations.

An ordinary administrative regulation with a last effective date on or after March 1, 2013, shall expire seven (7) years after its last effective date, except as provided by the certification process in KRS

13A.3104

.

An ordinary administrative regulation with a last effective date before March 1, 2013, shall expire on March 1, 2020, except as provided by the certification process in KRS

13A.3104

.

For all administrative regulations that expire under this section or KRS

13A.3104

, the regulations compiler shall:

Delete them from the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service;

Add them to the list of ineffective administrative regulations; and

Beginning on September 1, 2020, and at least once every six (6) months thereafter, publish a list of administrative regulations that have expired since the most recent previous list was published under this paragraph.

Within three (3) months of June 27, 2019, and at least once every six (6) months thereafter, the regulations compiler shall publish a list of existing administrative regulations and their corresponding last effective dates.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 77, § 4, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 192, § 10, effective June 27, 2019.

13A.3104.
Certification process for avoiding expiration of administrative regulations — When regulations expire.

If an administrative body does not want an administrative regulation to expire under KRS

13A.3102

, the administrative body shall, in the twelve (12) months prior to the expiration date:

Review the administrative regulation in its entirety for compliance with current law governing the subject matter of the administrative regulation;

File a certification letter with the regulations compiler stating whether the administrative regulation:

Shall be amended because it is not in compliance with current governing law or otherwise needs amendment;

Shall remain in effect without amendment because it is in compliance with current governing law; or

Is in need of amendment and a proposed amendment has already been filed; and

Not be required to consider KRS Chapter 13A drafting and formatting requirements as part of its review.

The certification letter shall be on the administrative body’s official letterhead, in the format prescribed by the regulations compiler, and include the following information:

The name of the administrative body;

The number of the administrative regulation;

The title of the administrative regulation;

The statement required by subsection (1)(b) of this section;

A brief statement in support of the decision; and

The authorizing signature of the administrative body.

If the certification letter was filed pursuant to subsection (1)(b)1. of this section, stating that the administrative regulation shall be amended, the administrative body shall file an amendment to the administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A within eighteen (18) months of the date the certification letter was filed.

If the amendment was filed in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection:

The administrative regulation shall not expire if the amendment is continuing through the administrative regulations process; or

The administrative regulation shall expire on the date the amendment is withdrawn or otherwise ceases going through the administrative regulations process.

Once the amendment is effective, the regulations compiler shall update the last effective date for that administrative regulation to reflect the amendment’s effective date.

If the amendment was not filed in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection, the administrative regulation shall expire at the end of the eighteen (18) month period.

If the certification letter was filed pursuant to subsection (1)(b)2. of this section, stating that the administrative regulation shall remain in effect without amendment, the regulations compiler shall:

Update the administrative regulation’s history line to state that a certification letter was received; and

Change the last effective date of the administrative regulation to the date the certification letter was received.

If the certification letter was filed pursuant to subsection (1)(b)3. of this section, stating that a proposed amendment has already been filed:

The administrative regulation shall not expire if the amendment is continuing through the administrative regulations process; or

The administrative regulation shall expire on the date the amendment is withdrawn or otherwise ceases going through the administrative regulations process.

Once the amendment is effective, the regulations compiler shall update the last effective date for that administrative regulation to reflect the amendment’s effective date.

If filed by the deadline established in KRS 13A.050(3), the regulations compiler shall publish in the Administrative Register of Kentucky each certification letter received:

In summary format; or

In its entirety.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 77, § 5, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 192, § 11, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 125, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

13A.312.
Actions required when authority over a subject matter is transferred to another administrative body or name of administrative body is changed — Return of administrative regulations to previous form if General Assembly does not confirm or codify executive order.

If authority over a subject matter is transferred to another administrative body or if the name of an administrative body is changed by statute or by executive order during the interim between regular sessions of the General Assembly, the administrative regulations of that administrative body in effect on the effective date of the statutory change or the executive order shall remain in effect as they exist until the administrative body that has been granted authority over the subject matter amends or repeals the administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

After receipt of a written request, submitted pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, to make changes to an administrative regulation pursuant to the statutory change or executive order, the regulations compiler shall alter the administrative regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section to:

Change the name of the administrative body pursuant to the provisions of the statute or executive order; and

Make any other technical changes necessary to carry out the provisions of the statute or executive order.

The administrative body that has been granted statutory authority over the subject matter shall provide to the regulations compiler in writing:

A listing of the administrative regulations that require any changes; and

The specific names, terms, or other information to be changed with those changes properly referenced.

The administrative body that has been granted statutory authority over the subject matter shall submit new forms to replace forms previously incorporated by reference in an administrative regulation if the only changes on the form are the name and mailing address of the administrative body. If there are additional changes to a form incorporated by reference, the administrative body shall promulgate an amendment to the existing administrative regulation and make the changes to the material incorporated by reference in accordance with KRS

13A.2255

.

If an administrative body is abolished by statute or executive order and the authority over its subject matter is not transferred to another administrative body, the Governor, or the secretary of the cabinet to which the administrative body was attached, shall promulgate an administrative regulation to repeal the existing administrative regulations that were promulgated by the abolished administrative body. The repeal shall be accomplished as provided by KRS

13A.310

.

If an executive order transfers authority over a subject matter to another administrative body or changes the name of an administrative body during the interim between regular sessions of the General Assembly, and the General Assembly does not codify or confirm the executive order during the next regular session, any and all administrative regulations promulgated to implement the unconfirmed executive order shall be returned to their previous form by the administrative body using the promulgation procedures established by KRS Chapter 13A, including but not limited to:

Withdrawal of a proposed administrative regulation;

Amendment or repeal of an existing administrative regulation;

Promulgation of a new administrative regulation; or

Submission of technical changes in the manner established by subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 180, § 20, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 141, § 4, effective July 13, 2004; 2016 ch. 82, § 29, effective July 15, 2016; 2021 ch. 7, § 14, effective February 2, 2021.

13A.315.
Expiration and withdrawal of administrative regulation prior to review by legislative committee — Effect of noncompliance with chapter — Withdrawal of deficient administrative regulation upon Governor’s notification.

An administrative regulation shall expire and shall not be reviewed by a legislative committee if:

It has not been reviewed or approved by the official or administrative body with authority to review or approve;

The statement of consideration and, if applicable, the amended after comments version are not filed on or before a deadline specified by this chapter;

The administrative body has failed to comply with the provisions of this chapter governing the filing of administrative regulations, the public hearing and public comment period, or the statement of consideration; or

The administrative regulation is deferred pursuant to KRS 13A.300(2) more than twelve (12) times.

An administrative regulation that has been found deficient by a legislative committee shall be withdrawn immediately if, pursuant to KRS

13A.330

, the Governor has determined that it shall be withdrawn.

The Governor shall notify the regulations compiler in writing and by telephone that he or she has determined that the administrative regulation found deficient shall be withdrawn.

The written withdrawal of an administrative regulation governed by the provisions of this subsection shall be made in a letter to the regulations compiler in the following format: “Pursuant to KRS

13A.330

, I have determined that (administrative regulation number and title) shall be (withdrawn, or withdrawn and amended to conform to the finding of deficiency, as applicable). The administrative regulation, (administrative regulation number and title), is hereby withdrawn.”

An administrative regulation governed by the provisions of this subsection shall be considered withdrawn upon receipt by the regulations compiler of the written withdrawal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 516, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 410, § 24, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 350, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 406, § 24, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 100, § 20, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 138, § 14, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 82, § 30, effective July 15, 2016; 2019 ch. 192, § 12, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 7, § 15, effective February 2, 2021.